Massachusetts, session 194th, S2563.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
1 SECTION 1. Section 15F of chapter 6 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
2 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 2 and 3, the words “Employ
3 Handicapped Persons Week” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- Persons with
4 Disabilities Employment Week.
5 SECTION 2. Section 15LLLL of said chapter 6, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
6 striking out, in line 2, the word “Autistic” and inserting in place thereof the following word:-
7 Autism.
8 SECTION 3. Section 15OOOOO of said chapter 6, as so appearing, is hereby amended
9 by striking out, in line 5, the words “disabled individuals” and inserting in place thereof the
10 following words:- individuals with disabilities.
1 of 61

11 SECTION 4. Section 40 of said chapter 6, as so appearing, is hereby amended by striking
12 out, in lines 4 and 5, the words “disabled American veterans” and inserting in place thereof the
13 following words:- American veterans with disabilities.
14 SECTION 5. Section 56 of said chapter 6 is hereby amended by striking out, in line 48,
15 as so appearing, the words “and handicapped persons” and inserting in place thereof the
16 following words:- persons and persons with disabilities.
17 SECTION 6. Section 106 of said chapter 6, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
18 striking out, in line 11, the words “who are disabled” and inserting in place thereof the following
19 words:- with disabilities.
20 SECTION 7. Section 131A of said chapter 6, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
21 striking out, in line 3, the words “the aged and disabled” and inserting in place thereof the
22 following words:- aged persons and persons with disabilities.
23 SECTION 8. Section 131B of said chapter 6, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
24 striking out, in lines 10 and 11, the words “the aged and disabled” and inserting in place thereof
25 the following words:- aged persons and persons with disabilities.
26 SECTION 9. Section 143 of said chapter 6, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
27 striking out, in line 11, the words “handicapped persons” and inserting in place thereof the
28 following words:- persons with disabilities.
29 SECTION 10. Section 172 of said chapter 6, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
30 striking out, in lines 92 and 93, the words “disabled person” and inserting in place thereof, in
31 each instance, the following words:- person with a disability.
2 of 61

32 SECTION 11. Section 172C of said chapter 6, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
33 striking out the definition of “Disabled person” and inserting in place thereof the following
34 definition:-
35 “Person with a disability”, a person with an intellectual or a developmental disability as
36 defined in section 1 of chapter 123B or who otherwise has an intellectual, developmental or
37 physical disability and who, as a result of such intellectual, developmental or physical disability,
38 is wholly or partially dependent on others to meet the daily living needs of such person with a
39 disability.
40 SECTION 12. Said section 172C of said chapter 6, as so appearing, is hereby further
41 amended by striking out, in lines 16 and 17, the words “disabled person” and inserting in place
42 thereof the following words:- person with a disability.
43 SECTION 13. Said section 172C of said chapter 6, as so appearing, is hereby further
44 amended by striking out, in line 18, the words “elderly or disabled persons” and inserting in
45 place thereof the following words:- elderly persons or persons with disabilities.
46 SECTION 14. Said section 172C of said chapter 6, as so appearing, is hereby further
47 amended by striking out, in lines 20 and 21, the words “disabled persons” and inserting in place
48 thereof the following words:- persons with disabilities.
49 SECTION 15. Said section 172C of said chapter 6, as so appearing, is hereby further
50 amended by striking out, in lines 33 and 34, the words “elderly or disabled person” and inserting
51 in place thereof the following words:- elderly person or person with a disability.
3 of 61

52 SECTION 16. Said section 172C of said chapter 6, as so appearing, is hereby further
53 amended by striking out, in line 36, the words “the disabled” and inserting in place thereof the
54 following words:- persons with disabilities.
55 SECTION 17. Section 172E of said chapter 6, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
56 striking out, in line 10, the words “or disabled person” and inserting in place thereof the
57 following words:- person or person with a disability.
58 SECTION 18. Said section 172E of said chapter 6, as so appearing, is hereby further
59 amended by striking out, in line 13, the words “or disabled persons” and inserting in place
60 thereof the following words:- person or person with a disability.
61 SECTION 19. Said section 172E of said chapter 6, as so appearing, is hereby further
62 amended by striking out, in line 21, the words “the disabled” and inserting in place thereof the
63 following words:- persons with disabilities.
64 SECTION 20. Section 178C of said chapter 6, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
65 striking out, in line 60, and in lines 138 and 139, the words “mentally retarded person” and
66 inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- person with an intellectual or a
67 developmental disability.
68 SECTION 21. Section 178K of said chapter 6, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
69 striking out, in line 236, the words “the mentally retarded” and inserting in place thereof the
70 following words:- a person with an intellectual or developmental disability.
4 of 61

71 SECTION 22. Said section 178K of said chapter 6, as so appearing, is hereby further
72 amended by striking out, in line 259, the words “mentally retarded person” and inserting in place
73 thereof the following words:- person with an intellectual or a developmental disability.
74 SECTION 23. Section 191 of said chapter 6, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
75 striking out, in line 17, the words “handicapping conditions” and inserting in place thereof the
76 following word:- disabilities.
77 SECTION 24. Section 196 of said chapter 6, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
78 striking out, in line 17, the words “hearing–impaired” and inserting in place thereof the following
79 words:- deaf or hard of hearing.
80 SECTION 25. Section 16D of chapter 6A of the General Laws is hereby amended by
81 striking out, in lines 58 and 59, as so appearing, the words “the disabled and chronically ill” and
82 inserting in place thereof the following words:- persons with disabilities and persons who are
83 chronically ill.
84 SECTION 26. Section 16R of said chapter 6A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
85 striking out, in line 5, the words “is disabled” and inserting in place thereof the following words:-
86 has a disability.
87 SECTION 27. Section 18B of said chapter 6A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
88 striking out, in line 153, the word “disabled” and inserting in place thereof the following word:-
89 disability.
90 SECTION 28. Section 2 of chapter 6C of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
91 amended by striking out, in line 84 and in lines 87 and 88, the words “a disabled rider advocate”
5 of 61

92 and inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- an advocate for riders with
93 disabilities.
94 SECTION 29. Section 5 of chapter 6D of the General Laws is hereby amended by
95 striking out, in line 13, as so appearing, the words “in racial, ethnic and disabled communities”
96 and inserting in place thereof the following words:- by race, ethnicity and disability.
97 SECTION 30. Section 4H of chapter 7 of the General Laws, as appearing, is hereby
98 amended by striking out, in line 84, and in lines 87 and 88, the words “disabled persons
99 protection commission” and inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following words:-
100 commission for the protection of persons with disabilities.
101 SECTION 31. Section 22N of said chapter 7 is hereby amended by striking out, in lines
102 13 and 14, as so appearing, the words “mental retardation” and inserting in place thereof the
103 following words:- intellectual or a developmental disability.
104 SECTION 32. Section 50 of said chapter 7, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
105 striking out, in lines 34 and 35, and in line 37, the words “or disabled workers” and inserting in
106 place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- workers or workers with disabilities.
107 SECTION 33. Section 27 of chapter 7C of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
108 amended by striking out, in line 13, the word “handicapped” and inserting in place thereof the
109 following word:- disability.
110 SECTION 34. Section 9 of chapter 8 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
111 amended by striking out, in line 30, the word “handicapped” and inserting in place thereof the
112 following word:- disability.
6 of 61

113 SECTION 35. Section 38 of chapter 10 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
114 amended by striking out, in line 9, the words “retarded children” and inserting in place thereof
115 the following words:- children with intellectual or a developmental disabilities.
116 SECTION 36. Said section 38 of said chapter 10, as so appearing, is hereby further
117 amended by striking out, in line 133, the words “handicapped person” and inserting in place
118 thereof the following words:- person with a disability.
119 SECTION 37. Section 15B of chapter 15 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
120 amended by striking out, in line 4, the words “visually-handicapped children” and inserting in
121 place thereof the following words:- children with visual impairments.
122 SECTION 38. Section 13 of chapter 15D of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
123 amended by striking out, in lines 48 and 49, the words “disabled parents than to the children of
124 non-disabled parents” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- parents with
125 disabilities than to the children of parents without disabilities.
126 SECTION 39. Section 2 of chapter 18 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
127 amended by striking out, in line 86, the word “disabled” and inserting in place thereof the
128 following words:- with disabilities.
129 SECTION 40. Said section 2 of said chapter 18, as so appearing, is hereby further
130 amended by striking out, in line 179, the words “adult handicapped” and inserting in place
131 thereof the following words:- adults with disabilities.
7 of 61

132 SECTION 41. Section 5 of said chapter 18, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
133 striking out, in line 18, the words “the disabled and the handicapped resident” and inserting in
134 place thereof the following words:- and residents with a disability.
135 SECTION 42. Section 21 of chapter 19 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
136 amended by inserting after the word “of”, in lines 10 and 15, each time it appears, the following
137 words:- persons who are.
138 SECTION 43. Said section 21 of said chapter 19, as so appearing, is hereby further
139 amended by inserting after the word “intellectual”, in lines 11, 18 and 32, each time it appears,
140 the following words:- or developmental.
141 SECTION 44. Said section 21 of said chapter 19, as so appearing, is hereby further
142 amended by striking out, in line 16, the words “and mentally retarded individuals” and inserting
143 in place thereof the following words:- persons and persons with intellectual or developmental
144 disabilities.
145 SECTION 45. Said section 4 of chapter 19A of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
146 hereby further amended by striking out the second paragraph and inserting in place thereof the
147 following paragraph:-
148 The department shall also serve as an advocate for the needs of adults with disabilities as
149 such needs and services overlap with the needs and services of elderly persons.
150 SECTION 46. Section 40 of said chapter 19A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
151 striking out, in line 47, the words “disabled enrollees’” and inserting in place thereof the
152 following words:- enrollees with disabilities.
8 of 61

153 SECTION 47. Said section 40 of said chapter 19A, as so appearing, is hereby s further
154 amended by striking out, in lines 49 and 50, the words “disabled individuals” and inserting in
155 place thereof the following words:- individuals with disabilities.
156 SECTION 48. Section 7 of chapter 19B of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
157 amended by striking out, in line 2, the words:- mental retardation.
158 SECTION 49. Section 8 of said chapter 19B, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
159 striking out, in line 3, the words:- mental retardation.
160 SECTION 50. Said section 8 of said chapter 19B, as so appearing, is hereby further
161 amended by striking out, in lines 6 and 7, the words “the mentally retarded” and inserting in
162 place thereof the following words:- persons with intellectual or developmental disabilities.
163 SECTION 51. Section 19 of said chapter 19B, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
164 striking out, in lines 126, 139, 280 and 281, 305, 384, 390 and 391, and 394 and 395, the words
165 “disabled persons protection commission” and inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the
166 following words:- commission for the protection of persons with disabilities.
167 SECTION 52. Chapter 19C of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out the
168 title and inserting in place thereof the following title:-
169 COMMISSION FOR THE PROTECTION OF PERSONS WITH DISABILITIES.
170 SECTION 53. Section 1 of said chapter 19C, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
171 hereby amended by striking out, in lines 4 and 33, the words “disabled person” and inserting in
172 place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- person with a disability.
9 of 61

173 SECTION 54. Said section 1 of said chapter 19C, as so appearing, is hereby further
174 amended by striking out the definition of “Caretaker” and inserting in place thereof the following
175 definition:-
176 ''Caretaker'', a parent, guardian or other person or agency responsible for the health or
177 welfare of a person with a disability, whether in the same home as the person with a disability or
178 in a relative's home, a foster home or any other day or residential setting.
179 SECTION 55. Said section 1 of said chapter 19C, as so appearing, is hereby further
180 amended by striking out, in line 13, the words “disabled persons protection commission” and
181 inserting in place thereof the following words:- commission for the protection of persons with
182 disabilities.
183 SECTION 56. Said section 1 of said chapter 19C, as so appearing, is hereby further
184 amended by striking out the definition of “Disabled person”.
185 SECTION 57. Said section 1 of said chapter 19C, as so appearing, is hereby further
186 amended by striking out, in lines 17 and 18, the words “is otherwise mentally or physically
187 disabled” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- otherwise has an intellectual,
188 developmental or physical disability.
189 SECTION 58. Said section 1 of said chapter 19C, as so appearing, is hereby further
190 amended by striking out, in lines 31 and 32, 42 and 46, the words “disabled persons” and
191 inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- persons with disabilities.
192 SECTION 59. Said section 1 of said chapter 19C, as so appearing, is hereby further
193 amended by inserting after the definition of “Mandated reporter” the definition:-
10 of 61

194 “Person with a disability”, a person between the ages of 18 to 59, inclusive, who is a
195 person with an intellectual or a developmental disability as defined in section 1 of chapter 123B
196 or who otherwise has an intellectual, developmental or physical disability and, as a result of such
197 disability, is wholly or partially dependent on others to meet daily living needs.
198 SECTION 60. Said section 1 of said chapter 19C, as so appearing, is hereby further
199 amended by striking out, in lines 39 and 41, the words “disabled person or persons” and inserting
200 in place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- person or persons with disabilities.
201 SECTION 61. Section 2 of said chapter 19C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
202 striking out, in line 2, the first time they appear, and in line 5, the words “disabled persons” and
203 inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- persons with disabilities.
204 SECTION 62. Said section 2 of said chapter 19C, as so appearing, is hereby further
205 amended by striking out, in lines 2 and 3, the words “, to be known as the disabled persons
206 protection commission”.
207 SECTION 63. Section 3 of said chapter 19C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
208 striking out, in lines 20 and 21, and in lines 28 and 29, the words “disabled persons” and
209 inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- persons with disabilities.
210 SECTION 64. Section 4 of said chapter 19C, as most recently amended by section 47 of
211 chapter 205 of the acts of 2024, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 1, 11, 16, 26, 28 and
212 35, the words “disabled person” and inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following
213 words:- person with a disability.
11 of 61

214 SECTION 65. Said section 4 of said chapter 19C, as so amended, is hereby further
215 amended by striking out, in line 29, the words “disability or otherwise mentally disabled” and
216 inserting in place thereof the following words:- or developmental disability.
217 SECTION 66. Said section 4 of said chapter 19C, as so amended, is hereby further
218 amended by striking out, in lines 30 and 31, the words “disabled person is physically disabled”
219 and inserting in place thereof the following words:- person with a disability is a person with a
220 physical disability
221 SECTION 67. Section 5 of said chapter 19C, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
222 hereby amended by striking out, in lines 1, 13, 33, 50, 63, 73 and 75, and in lines 77 and 78, the
223 words “disabled person” and inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following words:-
224 person with a disability.
225 SECTION 68. Said section 5 of said chapter 19C, as so appearing, is hereby further
226 amended by striking out, in line 9, the words “disabled person’s health” and inserting in place
227 thereof the following words:- person with a disability’s health.
228 SECTION 69. Said section 5 of said chapter 19C, as so appearing, is hereby further
229 amended by striking out, in line 12, the words “disabled person’s residence” and inserting in
230 place thereof the following words:- person with a disability’s residence.
231 SECTION 70. Section 6 of said chapter 19C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
232 striking out, in lines 10 and 15, the words “disabled person” and inserting in place thereof, in
233 each instance, the following words:- person with a disability.
12 of 61

234 SECTION 71. Section 7 of said chapter 19C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
235 striking out, in lines 4, 6 and 7, 12, 13, 16, 17 and 18, 18, 20 and 21, 22, 29, 35, 39 and 40, 46,
236 47 and 48, 59, 61, 65, 67 and 68, the words “disabled person” and inserting in place thereof, in
237 each instance, the following words: - person with a disability.
238 SECTION 72. Section 8 of said chapter 19C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
239 striking out, in line 2, the words “disabled person” and inserting in place thereof the following
240 words:- person with a disability.
241 SECTION 73. Said section 8 of said chapter 19C, as so appearing, is hereby further
242 amended by striking out, in line 6, the words “disabled persons” and inserting in place thereof
243 the following words:- the person with a disability.
244 SECTION 74. Section 10 of said chapter 19C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
245 striking out, in lines 7, 13, 19 and 29, the words “disabled person” and inserting in place thereof,
246 in each instance, the following words:- person with a disability.
247 SECTION 75. Section 11 of said chapter 19C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
248 striking out, in line 9, the words “disabled person” and inserting in place thereof the following
249 words:- person with a disability.
250 SECTION 76. Section 13 of said chapter 19C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
251 striking out, in lines 1 and 8, the words “disabled person” and inserting in place thereof, in each
252 instance, the following words:- person with a disability.
13 of 61

253 SECTION 77. Section 1 of chapter 19D of the General Laws is hereby amended by
254 striking out, in line 27, as so appearing, the words “elderly or disabled individuals” and inserting
255 in place thereof the following words:- elderly individuals or individuals with disabilities.
256 SECTION 78. Section 2 of chapter 21H of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
257 amended by striking out, in lines 73 and 74, the word “retarded” and inserting in place thereof
258 the following words:- for persons with intellectual or developmental disabilities.
259 SECTION 79. Section 16 of chapter 22C of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
260 amended by striking out, in lines 4 and 5, the words “temporarily or permanently disabled by
261 reason of” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- such trainee or officer suffers a
262 temporary or permanent disability caused by.
263 SECTION 80. Section 32 of said chapter 22C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
264 striking out, in line 13, the word “handicap” and inserting in place thereof the following word:-
265 disability.
266 SECTION 81. Clause (ix) of subsection (b) of section 1 of chapter 23B of the General
267 Laws, as appearing in section 102 of chapter 7 of the acts of 2023, is hereby amended by striking
268 out the words “the handicapped” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- persons
269 with disabilities.
270 SECTION 82. Section 10 of said chapter 23B, as appearing in section 107 of said chapter
271 7, is hereby amended by striking out the words “the handicapped” and inserting in place thereof
272 the following words:- persons with disabilities.
14 of 61

273 SECTION 83. Section 15 of chapter 23E of the General Laws is hereby amended by
274 striking out, in line 12, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, the words “disabled worker”
275 and inserting in place thereof the following words:- worker with a disability.
276 SECTION 84. Section 2WWW of chapter 29 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
277 hereby amended by striking out, in line 83, the words “disabled citizens” and inserting in place
278 thereof the following words:- citizens with disabilities.
279 SECTION 85. Section 9B of chapter 30 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
280 amended by striking out, in line 26, the words “disabled person” and inserting in place thereof
281 the following words:- person with a disability.
282 SECTION 86. Section 16 of chapter 31 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
283 amended by striking out, in lines 10 and 13, the words “handicapped person” and inserting in
284 place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- person with a disability.
285 SECTION 87. Section 1 of chapter 31A of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
286 amended by striking out, in line 24, the word “handicap” and inserting in place thereof the
287 following word:- disability.
288 SECTION 88. Section 21 of chapter 32 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
289 amended by striking out, in line 279, the words “Disabled Employees” and inserting in place
290 thereof the following words:- Employees with Disabilities.
291 SECTION 89. Said section 21 of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is hereby further
292 amended by striking out, in line 285, the words “disabled employee” and inserting in place
293 thereof the following words:- employee with a disability.
15 of 61

294 SECTION 90. Said section 21 of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is hereby further
295 amended by striking out, in lines 290 and 291, the words “disabled persons” and inserting in
296 place thereof the following words:- persons with disabilities.
297 SECTION 91. Said section 21 of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is hereby further
298 amended by striking out, in line 347, the words “disabled members” and inserting in place
299 thereof the following words:- members with disabilities.
300 SECTION 92. Said section 21 of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is hereby further
301 amended by striking out, in line 362, the words “disabled individual” and inserting in place
302 thereof the following words:- individual with a disability.
303 SECTION 93. Section 23 of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
304 striking out, in line 418, the word “handicap” and inserting in place thereof the following words:-
305 disability.
306 SECTION 94. Section 46 of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
307 striking out, in line 11, the words “become permanently disabled” and inserting in place thereof
308 the following words:- suffered a permanent disability.
309 SECTION 95. Section 75 of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
310 striking out, in line 11, the words “be permanently disabled, mentally or physically,” and
311 inserting in place thereof the following words:- have a permanent mental or physical disability.
312 SECTION 96. Section 80 of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
313 striking out, in lines 6 and 7, the words “be permanently disabled, mentally or physically,” and
16 of 61

314 inserting in place thereof the following words:- have a permanent mental or physical disability
315 caused.
316 SECTION 97. Section 81A of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
317 striking out, in lines 5 and 6, the words “becomes permanently disabled, mentally or physically,”
318 and inserting in place thereof the following words:- suffered a permanent physical or mental
319 disability caused.
320 SECTION 98. Section 83 of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
321 striking out, in lines 8 and 9, the words “be permanently disabled, mentally or physically,” and
322 inserting in place thereof the following words:- have a permanent mental or physical disability
323 caused.
324 SECTION 99. Section 83A of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
325 striking out, in lines 5 and 6, the words “becomes permanently disabled, mentally or physically,”
326 and inserting in place thereof the following words:- suffers a permanent mental or physical
327 disability caused.
328 SECTION 100. Section 85E of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
329 striking out, in lines 6 and 7, the words “becomes permanently disabled, mentally or physically,”
330 and inserting in place thereof the following words:- suffers a permanent mental or physical
331 disability caused.
332 SECTION 101. Section 85H of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
333 striking out, in line 4, the words “becomes permanently disabled mentally or physically” and
334 inserting in place thereof the following words:- suffers a permanent physical or mental disability
335 caused.
17 of 61

336 SECTION 102. Said section 85H of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is hereby further
337 amended by striking out, in line 16, the words “is disabled” and inserting in place thereof the
338 following words:- suffers a disability.
339 SECTION 103. Section 89E of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
340 striking out, in line 64, the words “or disabled children” and inserting in place thereof the
341 following words:- children or children with disabilities.
342 SECTION 104. Section 2 of chapter 32A of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
343 amended by striking out, in line 70, the words “handicapped child” and inserting in place thereof
344 the following words:- child with a disability.
345 SECTION 105. Section 23 of said chapter 32A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
346 striking out, in line 17, the words “hearing impaired” and inserting in place thereof the following
347 words:- deaf or hard of hearing”.
348 SECTION 106. Section 88 of chapter 33 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
349 amended by striking out, in line 4, the words “is disabled” and inserting in place thereof the
350 following words:- suffers a disability.
351 SECTION 107. Section 14B of chapter 34 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
352 hereby amended by striking out, in line 3, the words “handicapped person” and inserting in place
353 thereof the following words:- person with disabilities.
354 SECTION 108. Said section 14B of said chapter 34, as so appearing, is hereby further
355 amended by striking out, in line 4, the words “handicapped persons” and inserting in place
356 thereof the following words:- persons with disabilities.
18 of 61

357 SECTION 109. Said section 14B of said chapter 34, as so appearing, is hereby further
358 amended by striking out, in line 9, the words “the handicapped” and inserting in place thereof the
359 following words:- persons with disabilities.
360 SECTION 110. Section 3 of chapter 38 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
361 amended by striking out, in line 21, the words “mental retardation institution” and inserting in
362 place thereof the following words:- intermediate care facility for persons with intellectual or
363 developmental disabilities.
364 SECTION 111. Said section 3 of said chapter 38, as so appearing, is hereby further
365 amended by striking out, in line 23, the words “disabled person” and inserting in place thereof
366 the following words:- person with a disability.
367 SECTION 112. Section 4E of chapter 40 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
368 amended by striking out, in line 349, the words “developmentally disabled individuals” and
369 inserting in place thereof the following words:- individuals with developmental disabilities.
370 SECTION 113. Section 21 of said chapter 40, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
371 striking out, in lines 137, 192, and in lines 196 and 197, the words “disabled veterans” and
372 inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- veterans with disabilities.
373 SECTION 114. Said section 21 of said chapter 40, as so appearing, is hereby further
374 amended by striking out, in lines 137 and 138, 139 and 140, 192 and 193, and in line 197, the
375 words “handicapped persons” and inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following
376 words:- persons with disabilities.
19 of 61

377 SECTION 115. Said section 21 of said chapter 40, as so appearing, is hereby further
378 amended by striking out, in lines 142, 152 and 153, 155, 157 and 182, and in lines 198 and 199,
379 the words “handicapped person” and inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following
380 words:- person with disabilities.
381 SECTION 116. Said section 21 of said chapter 40, as so appearing, is hereby further
382 amended by striking out, in line 152, the words “disabled veteran” and inserting in place thereof
383 the following words:- veteran with a disability.
384 SECTION 117. Said section 21 of said chapter 40, as so appearing, is hereby further
385 amended by striking out, in lines 177 and 178, the word “Handicapped” and inserting in place
386 thereof the following word:- Disability.
387 SECTION 118. Said section 21 of said chapter 40, as so appearing, is hereby further
388 amended by striking out, in lines 185 and 186, the word “handicapped” and inserting in place
389 thereof, in each instance, the following word:- disability.
390 SECTION 119. Section 22 of said chapter 40, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
391 striking out, in lines 17 and 18, the words “disabled veteran or handicapped person” and
392 inserting in place thereof the following words:- veteran or other person with a disability.
393 SECTION 120. Said section 22 of said chapter 40, as so appearing, is hereby further
394 amended by striking out, in lines 20 and 21, the words “handicapped person” and inserting in
395 place thereof the following words:- person with a disability.
20 of 61

396 SECTION 121. Section 22A of said chapter 40, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
397 striking out, in lines 32 and 53, the words “disabled veteran” and inserting in place thereof, in
398 each instance, the following words:- veteran with a disability.
399 SECTION 122. Said section 22A of said chapter 40, as so appearing, is hereby further
400 amended by striking out, in lines 32 and 33, 35, 37, 53, 55 and 58, and in lines 68 and 69, the
401 words “handicapped person” and inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following
402 words:- person with a disability.
403 SECTION 123. Said section 22A of said chapter 40, as so appearing, is hereby further
404 amended by striking out, in line 61, the words “handicapped persons” and inserting in place
405 thereof the following words:- persons with disabilities.
406 SECTION 124. Said section 22A of said chapter 40, as so appearing, is hereby further
407 amended by striking out, in line 64, the word “Handicapped” and inserting in place thereof the
408 following word:- Disability.
409 SECTION 125. Section 22D of said chapter 40, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
410 striking out, in line 15, the words “handicapped persons” and inserting in place thereof the
411 following words:- persons with disabilities.
412 SECTION 126. Said section 22D of said chapter 40, as so appearing, is hereby further
413 amended by striking out, in line 17, the words “disabled veteran or handicapped person” and
414 inserting in place thereof the following words:- veteran or other person with a disability.
21 of 61

415 SECTION 127. Said section 22D of said chapter 40, as so appearing, is hereby further
416 amended by striking out, in line 20, the words “handicapped person” and inserting in place
417 thereof the following words:- person with a disability.
418 SECTION 128. Section 22G of said chapter 40, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
419 striking out, in line 3, the word “handicap” and inserting in place thereof the following word:-
420 disability.
421 SECTION 129. Section 3 of chapter 40A of the General Laws is hereby amended by
422 striking out, in line 96, as so appearing, the words “disabled person” and inserting in place
423 thereof the following words:- person with a disability.
424 SECTION 130. Said section 3 of said chapter 40A is hereby further amended by striking
425 out, in line 119, as so appearing, the words “handicapped access ramps” and inserting in place
426 thereof the following words:- access ramps for persons with disabilities.
427 SECTION 131. Section 6 of chapter 40R of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
428 amended by striking out, in lines 30, 35 and 37, the words “the disabled” and inserting in place
429 thereof, in each instance, the following words:- persons with disabilities.
430 SECTION 132. Section 98F of chapter 41 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
431 amended by striking out, in lines 13 and 14, the words “a handicapped individual” and inserting
432 in place thereof the following words:- a person with a disability.
433 SECTION 133. Section 86 of chapter 54 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
434 amended by striking out, in line 22, the words “permanently disabled voters” and inserting in
435 place thereof the following words:- voters with permanent disabilities.
22 of 61

436 SECTION 134. Said section 86 of said chapter 54, as so appearing, is hereby further
437 amended by striking out, in line 27, the words “permanently disabled voters’ list” and inserting
438 in place thereof the following words:- list of voters with permanent disabilities.
439 SECTION 135. Section 5 of chapter 59 of the General Laws is hereby amended by
440 striking out, in lines 715, 757 and 758, 800, 866 and 902, as so appearing, the words “disabled
441 veteran” and inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- veteran with a
442 disability.
443 SECTION 136. Section 3D of chapter 60 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
444 amended by striking out, in lines 8 and 9, and in line 21, the word “disabled” and inserting in
445 place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- persons with disabilities.
446 SECTION 137. Said section 3D of said chapter 60, as so appearing, is hereby further
447 amended by striking out, in line 10, the words "elderly and disabled persons” and inserting in
448 place thereof the following words:- elderly persons and persons with disabilities.
449 SECTION 138. Subsection (x) of section 6 of chapter 62 of the General Laws, as
450 amended by section 12 of chapter 206 of the acts of 2024, is hereby further amended by striking
451 out the words “is disabled” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- has a disability.
452 SECTION 139. Section 2 of chapter 64G of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
453 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 11, the words “developmentally
454 disabled individuals” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- persons with
455 intellectual or developmental disabilities.
23 of 61

456 SECTION 140. Said section 2 of said chapter 64G, as so appearing, is hereby further
457 amended by striking out, in lines 20 and 21, the words “developmentally disabled individual”
458 and inserting in place thereof the following words:- person with an intellectual or a
459 developmental disability.
460 SECTION 141. Section 6 of chapter 64H of the General Laws is hereby amended by
461 striking out, in line 198, as so appearing, the words “crippled person” and inserting in place
462 thereof the following words:- person with a physical disability.
463 SECTION 142. Said section 6 of said chapter 64H is hereby further amended by striking
464 out, in lines 206 and 207, as so appearing, the words “invalids and crippled persons” and
465 inserting in place thereof the following words:- sick persons and persons with physical
466 disabilities.
467 SECTION 143. Subsection (u) of said section 6 of said chapter 64H , as appearing in
468 section 29 of chapter 178 of the acts of 2024, is hereby amended by striking out the words “be
469 permanently disabled” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- have a permanent
470 disability.
471 SECTION 144. Said section 6 of said chapter 64H is hereby further amended by striking
472 out, in line 421, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, the words “elderly or handicapped
473 persons” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- elderly persons or persons with
474 disabilities.
475 SECTION 145. Said section 6 of said chapter 64H is hereby further amended by striking
476 out, in line 431, as so appearing, the words “developmentally disabled individuals” and inserting
477 in place thereof the following words:- individuals with developmental disabilities.
24 of 61

478 SECTION 146. Said section 6 of said chapter 64H is hereby further amended by striking
479 out, in lines 437 and 438, as so appearing, the words “a developmentally disabled individual”
480 and inserting in place thereof the following words:- an individual with a developmental
481 disability2834.
482 SECTION 147. Section 1C½ of chapter 69 of the General Laws, inserted by section 34 of
483 chapter 28 of the acts of 2023, is hereby amended by striking out the words “developmentally
484 disabled students” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- students with
485 developmental disabilities.
486 SECTION 148. Section 7 of chapter 71A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
487 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 9, the words “severely learning
488 disabled” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- having a severe learning disability.
489 SECTION 149. Chapter 71B of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out the
490 title, as so appearing, and inserting in place thereof the following title:-
491 CHILDREN WITH DISABILITIES.
492 SECTION 150. Section 1 of said chapter 71B, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
493 striking out, in line 13, the words “are not disabled” and inserting in place thereof the following
494 words:- do not have disabilities.
495 SECTION 151. Section 3 of said chapter 71B, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
496 striking out, in lines 175 and 217, the words “mental retardation” and inserting in place thereof,
497 in each instance, the following words:- developmental services.
25 of 61

498 SECTION 152. Section 8 of said chapter 71B, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
499 striking out, in line 10, the words “disabled child” and inserting in place thereof the following
500 words:- child with a disability.
501 SECTION 153. Section 12A of said chapter 71B is hereby amended by striking out the
502 definition of “Disabled person”, as so appearing.
503 SECTION 154. Said section 12A of said chapter 71B is hereby further amended by
504 striking out, in lines 14, 26, 30 and 31 and in line 33, as so appearing, the words “disabled
505 person” and inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- person with a
506 disability.
507 SECTION 155. Said section 12A of said chapter 71B is hereby further amended by
508 inserting after the definition of “Major life activity”, as so appearing, the following definition:-
509 “Person with a disability”, a person who is unable to engage in substantial gainful activity
510 by reason of medically-determinable physical or mental impairment which can be expected to
511 result in death or be of at least 12 months' duration; provided, however, that such impairment
512 shall be of such severity that the person is unable to do such person’s previous work, if any, and,
513 considering the person’s age, education and work experience, cannot engage in substantial
514 gainful activity.
515 SECTION 156. Section 12B of said chapter 71B is hereby amended by striking out, in
516 line 6, as so appearing, the words "disabled persons” and inserting in place thereof the following
517 words:- persons with disabilities.
26 of 61

518 SECTION 157. Section 12C of said chapter 71B is hereby amended by striking out, in
519 lines 1, 17, 31, 37, 44 and 45, 56, 65, 74 and 75, and in line 92, as so appearing, the words
520 “disabled person” and inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- person
521 with a disability.
522 SECTION 158. Said section 12C of said chapter 71B is hereby further amended by
523 striking out, in lines 45 and 46, as so appearing, the words “be disabled” and inserting in place
524 thereof the following words:- have a disability.
525 SECTION 159. Said section 12C of said chapter 71B is hereby further amended by
526 striking out, in line 50, as so appearing, the words “is not disabled” and inserting in place thereof
527 the following words:- does not have a disability.
528 SECTION 160. Section 22D of chapter 74 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
529 hereby amended by striking out, in lines 3 and 4, and in line 6, the words “disabled veterans” and
530 inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- veterans with disabilities.
531 SECTION 161. Section 2 of chapter 75 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
532 amended by striking out, in lines 29 and 30, the words “as developmentally disabled” and
533 inserting in place thereof the following words:- with a developmental disability.
534 SECTION 162. Section 12B of chapter 76 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
535 hereby amended by striking out, in line 197, the word “handicap” and inserting in place thereof
536 the following words:- disability.
537 SECTION 163. Section 19E of chapter 78 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
538 hereby amended by striking out, in line 40, the words “the handicapped and disadvantaged” and
27 of 61

539 inserting in place thereof the following words:- persons with disabilities and disadvantaged
540 persons.
541 SECTION 164. Said section 19E of said chapter 78, as so appearing, is hereby further
542 amended by striking out, in lines 51 and 52, the words “persons who are visually impaired,
543 mentally, physically, or emotionally handicapped” and inserting in place thereof the following
544 words:- persons with visual, mental, physical or emotional disabilities. 77
545 SECTION 165. Section 19J of said chapter 78, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
546 striking out, in line 12, the word “handicapped” and inserting in place thereof the following
547 word:- disability.
548 SECTION 166. Section 2 of chapter 85 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
549 amended by striking out, in line 95, as so appearing, the words “otherwise handicapped children”
550 and inserting in place thereof the following words:- other children with disabilities.
551 SECTION 167. Section 2 of chapter 90 of the General Laws is hereby amended by
552 striking out, in line 39, as so appearing, the words “disabled persons” and inserting in place
553 thereof the following words:- persons with disabilities.
554 SECTION 168. Said section 2 of said chapter 90 is hereby further amended by striking
555 out, in line 185, and in lines 257 and 258, as so appearing, the words “or handicap”.
556 SECTION 169. Said section 2 of said chapter 90 is hereby further amended by striking
557 out, in line 246, as so appearing, the words “Disabled Veteran” and inserting in place thereof the
558 following words:- Veteran with a Disability.
28 of 61

559 SECTION 170. Said section 2 of said chapter 90 is hereby further amended by striking
560 out, in line 262, as so appearing, the words “and handicap”.
561 SECTION 171. Said section 2 of said chapter 90 is hereby further amended by striking
562 out, in lines 307, 310 and 339, as so appearing, the words “handicapped persons” and inserting in
563 place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- persons with disabilities.
564
565 SECTION 172. Said section 2 of said chapter 90 is hereby further amended by striking
566 out, in lines 321, 333 and 356, as so appearing, the word “handicapped” and inserting in place
567 thereof, in each instance, the following word:- accessible.
568 SECTION 173. Said section 2 of said chapter 90 is hereby further amended by striking
569 out, in line 322, as so appearing, the words “handicapped person” and inserting in place thereof
570 the following words:- person with a disability.
571 SECTION 174. Said section 2 of said chapter 90 is hereby further amended by striking
572 out, in lines 325, 352, 355, 358, 363, 374, 375, 376, 378 and 379, 380, 383, 384, 385, 387 and
573 389, as so appearing, the word “handicapped” and inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the
574 following word:- disability.
575 SECTION 175. Section 13A of said chapter 90, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
576 striking out, in line 12, the word “handicap” and inserting in place thereof the following word:-
577 disability.
29 of 61

578 SECTION 176. Section 41 of chapter 92 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
579 amended by striking out, in lines 4 and 5, the words “disabled veteran or a handicapped person”
580 and inserting in place thereof the following words:- veteran or other person with a disability.
581 SECTION 177. Section 4 of chapter 92B of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
582 amended by striking out, in line 28, the word “handicap” and inserting in place thereof the
583 following word:- disability.
584 SECTION 178. Section 82 of chapter 93 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
585 amended by striking out, in lines 6 and 7, the words “he becomes significantly physically or
586 medically disabled” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- the buyer suffers a
587 significant physical or medical disability.
588 SECTION 179. Section 103 of said chapter 93, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
589 striking out, in line 2, the word “handicap” and inserting in place thereof the following word:-
590 disability.
591 SECTION 180. Section 6 of chapter 93B of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
592 amended by striking out, in line 173, the word “disabled” and inserting in place thereof the
593 following word:- has a disability.
594 SECTION 181. Section 295CC of chapter 94 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
595 hereby amended by striking out, in lines 5 and 6, the words “handicapped person or disabled
596 veteran number plates” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- veteran or other
597 person with a disability number plate.
30 of 61

598 SECTION 182. Section 4O of said chapter 111, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
599 striking out, in line 24, the words “mental retardation” and inserting in place thereof the
600 following words:- developmental services.
601 SECTION 183. Section 6D of said chapter 111, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
602 striking out, in line 2, and in lines 23 and 24, the words “genetically handicapped persons” and
603 inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- persons with genetic
604 disabilities.
605 SECTION 184. Section 24E of said chapter 111, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
606 striking out, in line 9, the word “handicap” and inserting in place thereof the following word:-
607 disability.
608 SECTION 185. Section 25B of said chapter 111, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
609 striking out, in lines 55 and 56, the words “the developmentally disabled or mentally ill” and
610 inserting in place thereof the following words:- persons with developmental disabilities or
611 mentally ill persons.
612 SECTION 186. Section 25C of said chapter 111, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
613 striking out, in lines 141 and 142, and in lines 192 and 193, the words “the mentally ill or
614 developmentally disabled” and inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following words:-
615 mentally ill persons or persons with developmental disabilities.
616 SECTION 187. Section 62J of said chapter 111, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
617 striking out, in lines 2 and 3, the words “crippled and deformed children” and inserting in place
618 thereof the following words:- children with physical disabilities.
31 of 61

619 SECTION 188. Said section 62J of said chapter 111, as so appearing, is hereby further
620 amended by striking out, in line 4, the words “crippled children” and inserting in place thereof
621 the following words:- children with physical disabilities.
622 SECTION 189. Said section 62J of said chapter 111, as so appearing, is hereby further
623 amended by striking out, in line 14, the words “mental retardation” and inserting in place thereof
624 the following words:- intellectual or developmental disability.
625 SECTION 190. Section 65A of said chapter 111, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
626 striking out, in line 3, the word “crippled” and inserting in place thereof the following words:-
627 persons who became physically disabled.
628 SECTION 191. Said section 65A of said chapter 111, as so appearing, is hereby further
629 amended by striking out, in line 4, the words “crippled children” and inserting in place thereof
630 the following words:- children with physical disabilities.
631 SECTION 192. Section 67E of said chapter 111, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
632 striking out, in lines 40 and 41, the words “mental retardation” and inserting in place thereof the
633 following words:- intellectual or developmental disability.
634 SECTION 193. Section 69E of said chapter 111, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
635 striking out, in line 9, the words “mental retardation” and inserting in place thereof the following
636 words:- intellectual or developmental disability.
637 SECTION 194. Section 72M of said chapter 111, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
638 striking out, in line 24, the word “disabled” and inserting in place thereof the following words:-
639 persons with disabilities.
32 of 61

640 SECTION 195. Section 72O of said chapter 111, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
641 striking out, in lines 48 and 49, and in line 61, the word “disabled” and inserting in place thereof,
642 in each instance, the following words:- persons with disabilities.
643 SECTION 196. Section 72Y of said chapter 111, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
644 striking out, in lines 11 and 12, the word “retarded” and inserting in place thereof the following
645 words:- persons with intellectual or developmental disabilities.
646 SECTION 197. Section 193 of said chapter 111, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
647 striking out, in lines 12 and 13, the words “or retarded”.
648 SECTION 198. Section 220 of said chapter 111, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
649 striking out, in lines 20 and 21, the words “disabled persons protection commission” and
650 inserting in place thereof the following words:- commission for the protection of persons with
651 disabilities.
652 SECTION 199. Section 1 of chapter 111G of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
653 hereby amended by striking out, in line 13, the words “handicapping conditions” and inserting in
654 place thereof the following word:- disabilities.
655 SECTION 200. Section 23A of chapter 112 of the General Laws is hereby amended by
656 striking out, in line 38, as so appearing, the words “the handicapped” and inserting in place
657 thereof the following words:- persons with disabilities.
658 SECTION 201. Section 87B½ of said chapter 112, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
659 striking out, in line 195, the word “disabled or incompetent said” and inserting in place thereof
660 the following words:- has a disability or is incompetent, such.
33 of 61

661 SECTION 202. Section 87XX½ of said chapter 112, as so appearing, is hereby amended
662 by striking out, in line 15, the words “the disabled” and inserting in place thereof the following
663 words:- persons with disabilities.
664 SECTION 203. Section 163 of said chapter 112, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
665 striking out, in line 31, the words “physically or mentally handicapped individuals” and inserting
666 in place thereof the following words:- persons with physical disabilities or mental health
667 conditions.
668 SECTION 204. Chapter 118A of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out the
669 title, as so appearing, and inserting in place thereof the following title:-
670 ASSISTANCE TO THE AGED AND PERSONS WITH DISABILITIES.
671 SECTION 205. Section 1 of said chapter 118A, as so appearing is hereby amended by
672 striking out, in line 3, the words “aged and disabled persons” and inserting in place thereof the
673 following words:- the aged and persons with disabilities.
674 SECTION 206. Said section 1 of said chapter 118A, as so appearing, is hereby further
675 amended by striking out, in line 7, the words “aged and disabled individuals” and inserting in
676 place thereof the following words:- the aged and persons with disabilities.
677 SECTION 207. Said section 1 of said chapter 118A, as so appearing, is hereby further
678 amended by striking out, in line 16, the word “disabled” and inserting in place thereof the
679 following words:- persons with disabilities.
34 of 61

680 SECTION 208. Section 7 of said chapter 118A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
681 striking out, in lines 1 and 2, the words “and disabled residents” and inserting in place thereof the
682 following words:- residents and residents with disabilities.
683 SECTION 209. Section 9D of chapter 118E of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
684 hereby amended by striking out, in lines 35 and 36, the words “and disabled persons” and
685 inserting in place thereof the following words:- persons and persons with disabilities.
686 SECTION 210. Section 16 of said chapter 118E, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
687 striking out, in lines 2 and 3, and in line 14, the words “disabled residents” and inserting in place
688 thereof, in each instance, the following words:- residents with disabilities.
689 SECTION 211. Section 16A of said chapter 118E, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
690 striking out, in line 2, the words “disabled children” and inserting in place thereof the following
691 words:- children with disabilities.
692 SECTION 212. Section 16D of said chapter 118E, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
693 striking out, in line 44, the word “disabled” and inserting in place thereof the following words:-
694 has a disability.
695 SECTION 213. Section 19 of said chapter 118E, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
696 striking out, in line 8, the word “handicapping” and inserting in place thereof the following
697 word:- disabling.
698 SECTION 214. Section 31 of said chapter 118E is hereby amended by striking out, in
699 line 16, as so appearing, the words “permanently and totally disabled” and inserting in place
700 thereof the following words:- has a permanent and total disability.
35 of 61

701 SECTION 215. Clause (3) of subsection (b) of said section 31 of said chapter 118E, as
702 appearing in section 20 of chapter 197 of the acts of 2024, is hereby amended by striking out the
703 words “permanently and totally disabled” and inserting in place thereof the following words:-
704 has a permanent and total disability.
705 SECTION 216. Section 78 of said chapter 118E, as appearing in the 2022 Official
706 Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 10 and 11, the words “non-disabled persons”
707 and inserting in place thereof the following words:- persons without disabilities.
708 SECTION 217. Section 23 of chapter 119 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
709 amended by striking out, in lines 49 and 50, the words “mental retardation” and inserting in place
710 thereof the following words:- an intellectual or a developmental disability.
711 SECTION 218. Section 14 of chapter 120 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
712 amended by striking out, in line 3, the words “developmentally disabled” and inserting in place
713 thereof the following words:- a person with a developmental disability.
714 SECTION 219. Section 10 of chapter 121A of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
715 hereby amended by striking out, in line 153, the words “handicapped persons” and inserting in
716 place thereof the following words:- persons with disabilities.
717 SECTION 220. Said section 10 of said chapter 121A, as so appearing, is hereby further
718 amended by striking out, in line 154, the words “learning disabled children” and inserting in
719 place thereof the following words:- children with learning disabilities.
36 of 61

720 SECTION 221. Section 18D of said chapter 121A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
721 striking out, in line 87, the words “handicapped persons” and inserting in place thereof the
722 following words:- persons with disabilities.
723 SECTION 222. Section 1 of chapter 121B of the General Laws is hereby amended by
724 striking out the definition of “Handicapped persons”, as so appearing.
725 SECTION 223. Said section 1 of said chapter 121B is hereby further amended by
726 inserting after the definition of "Operating agency”, as so appearing, the following definition:-
727 "Person with a disability of low income'', a person whose annual net income is less than
728 the amount necessary to enable such person to maintain decent, safe and sanitary housing and
729 who has been determined, pursuant to regulations issued by the secretary of housing and livable
730 communities, to have an impairment which is expected to be of long, continued and indefinite
731 duration, which substantially impedes the ability to live independently in conventional housing
732 and which is of such a nature that such ability could be improved by more suitable housing
733 conditions; provided, however, that except as required by federal law and notwithstanding any
734 other law to the contrary, a history of alcohol or substance use shall not constitute a qualifying
735 impairment; provided further, that eligibility for protection as a person with a disability under
736 state or federal anti-discrimination laws shall not constitute a guarantee of eligibility for housing
737 as a person with a disability of low income; and provided further, that a person who has a
738 disability as defined in paragraph 17 of section 1 of chapter 151B shall still meet the definition
739 herein in order to be eligible for housing as a person with a disability of low income.
37 of 61

740 SECTION 224. Section 26 of said chapter 121B is hereby amended by striking out, in
741 line 175, and in lines 182 and 183, as so appearing, the words “handicapped persons” and
742 inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- persons with disabilities.
743 SECTION 225. Said section 26 of said chapter 121B is hereby further amended by
744 striking out, in line 176, as so appearing, the words “is handicapped” and inserting in place
745 thereof the following words:- has a disability.
746 SECTION 226. Said section 26 of said chapter 121B is hereby further amended by
747 striking out, in lines 184 and 186, as so appearing, the words “handicapped residents” and
748 inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- residents with disabilities.
749 SECTION 227. Said section 26 of said chapter 121B is hereby further amended by
750 striking out, in lines 262 and 265, as so appearing, the words “handicapped person” and inserting
751 in place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- person with a disability.
752 SECTION 228. Section 32 of said chapter 121B, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
753 striking out, in line 116, the word “handicap” and inserting in place thereof the following words:-
754 disability.
755 SECTION 229. Said section 32 of said chapter 121B, as so appearing, is hereby further
756 amended by striking out, in lines 130 and 136, the words “disabled veterans” and inserting in
757 place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- veterans with disabilities.
758 SECTION 230. Said section 32 of said chapter 121B, as so appearing, is hereby further
759 amended by striking out, in lines 150, 153 and 155 and 156, the word “handicap-accessible” and
760 inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following word:- accessible.
38 of 61

761 SECTION 231. Said section 32 of said chapter 121B, as so appearing, is hereby further
762 amended by striking out, in line 181, the words “disabled veteran” and inserting in place thereof
763 the following words:- veteran with a disability.
764 SECTION 232. Section 34 of said chapter 121B is hereby amended by striking out, in
765 lines 48 and 49, as so appearing, the words “is permanently and totally disabled” and inserting in
766 place thereof the following words:- has a permanent and total disability.
767 SECTION 233. Section 38 of said chapter 121B, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
768 striking out, in lines 30, 37 and 38, and in line 39, the words “handicapped persons” and
769 inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- persons with disabilities.
770 SECTION 234. Section 38A of said chapter 121B, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
771 striking out, in lines 2, 8 and 16, the words “the handicapped” and inserting in place thereof, in
772 each instance, the following words:- persons with disabilities.
773 SECTION 235. Said section 38A of said chapter 121B, as so appearing, is hereby further
774 amended by striking out, in line 7, the words “handicapped person” and inserting in place thereof
775 the following words:- person with a disability.
776 SECTION 236. Said section 38A of said chapter 121B, as so appearing, is hereby further
777 amended by striking out, in lines 11 and 12, 14, 18 and 19, 21, 25, 28, 32 and 33, and in lines 35
778 and 36, the words “handicapped persons” and inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the
779 following words:- persons with disabilities.
39 of 61

780 SECTION 237. Said section 38A of said chapter 121B, as so appearing, is hereby further
781 amended by striking out, in line 30, the words “physically handicapped” and inserting in place
782 thereof the following words:- persons with physical disabilities.
783 SECTION 238. Said section 38A of said chapter 121B, as so appearing, is hereby further
784 amended by striking out, in lines 31 and 32, the words “mental retardation, emotional
785 deficiencies” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- intellectual or developmental
786 disabilities.
787 SECTION 239. Said section 38A of said chapter 121B, as so appearing, is hereby further
788 amended by striking out, in lines 32 and 33, the words “socially disadvantaged and handicapped
789 persons” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- socially disadvantaged persons with
790 disabilities.
791 SECTION 240. Section 38D of said chapter 121B is hereby amended by striking out, in
792 line 156, as so appearing, the words “elderly and handicapped persons” and inserting in place
793 thereof the following words:- elderly persons and persons with disabilities.
794 SECTION 241. Section 39 of said chapter 121B, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
795 striking out, in lines 3, 38 and 39, 44, 48, 50, 52, 63, 68, 73, 76, 89, 97 and 100, the words
796 “handicapped persons” and inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following words:-
797 persons with disabilities.
798 SECTION 242. Said section 39 of said chapter 121B, as so appearing, is hereby further
799 amended by striking out, in line 95, the words “handicapped person” and inserting in place
800 thereof the following words:- person with a disability.
40 of 61

801 SECTION 243. Section 40 of said chapter 121B, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
802 striking out, in lines 2, 6, 12, 19 and 20, 28 and 29, and in lines 62 and 63, the words
803 “handicapped persons” and inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following words:-
804 persons with disabilities.
805 SECTION 244. Said section 40 of said chapter 121B, as so appearing, is hereby further
806 amended by striking out, in line 13, the words “is handicapped” and inserting in place thereof the
807 following words:- has a disability.
808 SECTION 245. Said section 40 of said chapter 121B, as so appearing, is hereby further
809 amended by striking out, in lines 24 and 26, the words “the handicapped” and inserting in place
810 thereof, in each instance, the following words:- persons with disabilities.
811 SECTION 246. Said section 40 of said chapter 121B, as so appearing, is hereby further
812 amended by striking out, in lines 27 and 41, the words “handicapped person” and inserting in
813 place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- person with a disability.
814 SECTION 247. Section 41A of said chapter 121B, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
815 striking out, in line 5, the words “handicapped persons” and inserting in place thereof the
816 following words:- persons with disabilities.
817 SECTION 248. Said section 41A of said chapter 121B, as so appearing, is hereby further
818 amended by striking out, in lines 6 and 7, the words “is handicapped” and inserting in place
819 thereof the following words:- have a disability.
820 SECTION 249. Said section 41A of said chapter 121B, as so appearing, is hereby further
821 amended by striking out, in lines 18 to 20, inclusive, the words “handicapped persons of families
41 of 61

822 of low income, of which one or more persons is handicapped” and inserting in place thereof the
823 following words:- families of low income of which 1 or more persons have a disability.
824 SECTION 250. Section 42 of said chapter 121B, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
825 striking out, in lines 6 and 19, the words “handicapped persons” and inserting in place thereof, in
826 each instance, the following words:- persons with a disability.
827 SECTION 251. Said section 42 of said chapter 121B, as so appearing, is hereby further
828 amended by striking out, in lines 7 and 20, the words “is handicapped” and inserting in place
829 thereof, in each instance, the following words:- have a disability.
830 SECTION 252. Section 44 of said chapter 121B, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
831 striking out, in line 10, the words “handicapped persons” and inserting in place thereof the
832 following words:- with disabilities.
833 SECTION 253. Said section 44 of said chapter 121B, as so appearing, is hereby further
834 amended by striking out, in line 11, the words “persons is handicapped” and inserting in place
835 thereof the following words:- have a disability.
836 SECTION 254. Section 2 of chapter 121E of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
837 hereby amended by striking out, in line 12, the words “disabled persons” and inserting in place
838 thereof the following words:- persons with disabilities.
839 SECTION 255. Section 1 of chapter 122 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
840 amended by striking out, in line 11, the words “mental retardation” and inserting in place thereof
841 the following words:- intellectual or developmental disability.
42 of 61

842 SECTION 256. Section 14 of said chapter 122, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
843 striking out, in lines 3 and 4, the words “mental retardation” and inserting in place thereof the
844 following words:- intellectual or developmental disability.
845 SECTION 257. Section 1 of chapter 123A of the General Laws is hereby amended by
846 striking out, in lines 45 and 46, as so appearing, the words “mentally retarded person” and
847 inserting in place thereof the following words:- person with an intellectual or a developmental
848 disability.
849 SECTION 258. Chapter 123B of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out the
850 title, as so appearing, and inserting in place thereof the following title:-
851 PERSONS WITH INTELLECTUAL OR DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES.
852 SECTION 259. Section 3 of said chapter 123B, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
853 striking out, in line 5, the words “the mentally retarded” and inserting in place thereof the
854 following words:- persons with intellectual or developmental disabilities.
855 SECTION 260. Said section 3 of said chapter 123B, as so appearing, is hereby further
856 amended by striking out, in line 18, the words “intellectually disabled ward” and inserting in
857 place thereof the following words:- ward with an intellectual or a developmental disability.
858 SECTION 261. Section 133E of chapter 127 of the General Laws is hereby amended by
859 striking out, in line 14, as so appearing, the words “mentally retarded person” and inserting in
860 place thereof the following words:- person with an intellectual or a developmental disability.
43 of 61

861 SECTION 262. Section 5 of chapter 128A of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
862 hereby amended by striking out, in line 362, the word “, disabled” and inserting in place thereof
863 the following words: jockeys, jockeys with disabilities.
864 SECTION 263. Section 1 of chapter 129 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
865 amended by striking out, in line 20, the words “hearing impaired” and inserting in place thereof
866 the following words:- hard of hearing.
867 SECTION 264. Section 17C of chapter 130 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
868 hereby amended by striking out, in line 23, the words “disabled person” and inserting in place
869 thereof the following words:- person with a disability.
870 SECTION 265. Section 1 of chapter 131 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
871 amended by inserting after the definition of “Open season” the following 2 definitions:-
872 “Person with a developmental disability'', (a) an individual 5 years of age or older with a
873 severe, chronic disability that: (i) is attributable to a mental or physical impairment resulting
874 from an intellectual disability, autism, Smith-Magenis syndrome or Prader–Willi syndrome; (ii)
875 is manifested before the individual attains age 22; (iii) is likely to continue indefinitely; (iv)
876 results in substantial functional limitations in 3 or more of the following areas of major life
877 activity: (1) self-care; (2) receptive and expressive language; (3) learning; (4) mobility; (5) self-
878 direction; (6) capacity for independent living; and (7) economic self-sufficiency; and (v) reflects
879 the individual's need for a combination and sequence of special, interdisciplinary or generic
880 services, supports or other assistance that is of an extended or lifelong duration and is
881 individually planned and coordinated; or (b) an individual under the age of 5 who has a
882 substantial developmental delay or specific congenital or acquired condition with a high
44 of 61

883 probability that the condition will result in a developmental disability if services are not
884 provided; provided, however, that a person who has a developmental disability may be
885 considered to be mentally ill; and provided further, that no person with a developmental
886 disability shall be considered to be mentally ill solely by reason of the person's developmental
887 disability.
888 ''Person with an intellectual disability'', a person who has a disability, characterized by
889 significant limitations in both intellectual functioning and adaptive behavior as expressed in
890 conceptual, social and practical adaptive skills beginning before age 18 and consistent with the
891 most recent definition provided by the American Association on Intellectual and Developmental
892 Disabilities; provided, however, that in applying this definition, the following shall be
893 considered: (i) limitations in present functioning within the context of community environments
894 typical of the individual's age, peers and culture; (ii) cultural and linguistic diversity and
895 differences in communication, sensory, motor and behavioral factors; (iii) limitations often
896 coexist with strengths within an individual; (iv) an important purpose of describing limitations is
897 to develop a profile of needed supports; and (v) with appropriate personalized supports over a
898 sustained period, the life functioning of a person with an intellectual disability will generally
899 improve; provided further, that a person who has an intellectual disability may be considered to
900 be mentally ill; and provided further, that no person with an intellectual disability shall be
901 considered to be mentally ill solely by reason of the person's intellectual disability.
902 SECTION 266. Section 13 of said chapter 131, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
903 striking out, in lines 48 and 49, the words “the mentally retarded” and inserting in place thereof
904 the following words:- persons with intellectual or developmental disabilities.
45 of 61

905 SECTION 267. Said section 13 of said chapter 131, as so appearing, is hereby further
906 amended by striking out, in line 50, the words “mentally retarded students” and inserting in place
907 thereof the following words:- students with intellectual or developmental disabilities.
908 SECTION 268. Section 69 of said chapter 131, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
909 striking out, in lines 8 and 9, the words “is permanently disabled” and inserting in place thereof
910 the following words:- has a permanent disability.
911 SECTION 269. Section 2D of chapter 132A of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
912 hereby amended by striking out, in line 16, the words “disabled veteran” and inserting in place
913 thereof the following words:- veteran with a disability.
914 SECTION 270. Said section 2D of said chapter 132A, as so appearing, is hereby further
915 amended by striking out, in line 17, the words “handicapped person” and inserting in place
916 thereof the following words:- other person with a disability.
917 SECTION 271. Section 30A of chapter 149 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
918 hereby amended by striking out, in line 22, the words “mental retardation” and inserting in place
919 thereof the following words:- developmental services.
920 SECTION 272. Section 105D of said chapter 149, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
921 striking out, in line 9, the words “is mentally or physically disabled” and inserting in place
922 thereof the following words:- has a mental or physical disability.
923 SECTION 273. Section 1A of chapter 151 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
924 hereby amended by striking out, in line 32, the words “handicapped person” and inserting in
925 place thereof the following words:- person with a disability.
46 of 61

926 SECTION 274. Section 9 of said chapter 151, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
927 striking out, in line 5, the words “physical or mental deficiency or injury” and inserting in place
928 thereof the following words:- physical or mental disability.
929 SECTION 275. Said section 9 of said chapter 151, as so appearing, is hereby further
930 amended by striking out, in line 7, the words “handicapped person” and inserting in place thereof
931 the following words:- person with a disability.
932 SECTION 276. Section 1 of chapter 151B of the General Laws is hereby amended by
933 striking out, in lines 133 and 134, and in line 154, as so appearing, the words “handicapped
934 person” and inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- person with a
935 disability.
936 SECTION 277. Said section 1 of said chapter 151B is hereby further amended by striking
937 out, in lines 137 and 155, as so appearing, the word “handicap” and inserting in place thereof, in
938 each instance, the following word:- disability.
939 SECTION 278. Subsection 17 of said section 1 of said chapter 151B, as appearing in
940 section 19 of chapter 285 of the acts of 2024, is hereby amended by striking out the word
941 “handicap”, each time it appears, and inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following
942 word:- disability.
943 SECTION 279. Said section 1 of said chapter 151B is hereby further amended by striking
944 out, in lines 160 and 161, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, the words “physically or
945 mentally handicapped person” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- person with a
946 physical or mental disability.
47 of 61

947 SECTION 280. Section 3 of said chapter 151B, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
948 striking out, in line 22, the word “handicap” and inserting in place thereof the following word:-
949 disability.
950 SECTION 281. Said section 3 of said chapter 151B, as so appearing, is hereby further
951 amended by striking out, in lines 22 and 23, the words “handicapped person” and inserting in
952 place thereof the following words:- person with a disability.
953 SECTION 282. Said section 3 of said chapter 151B, as so appearing, is hereby further
954 amended by striking out, in line 56, the words “elderly and handicapped persons” and inserting
955 in place thereof the following words:- elderly persons and persons with disabilities.
956 SECTION 283. Section 4 of said chapter 151B is hereby amended by striking out, in
957 lines 190, 207, 213 and 214, 233, 267, 296, 303, 315, 329, 364, 371, 381, 401, 481, 495, 502,
958 692, 718 and 723, as so appearing, the word “handicap” and inserting in place thereof, in each
959 instance, the following word:- disability.
960 SECTION 284. Said section 4 of said chapter 151B is hereby further amended by striking
961 out, in lines 191, 207, 214, 402 and 403, 414, 421, 634, 645 and 693, as so appearing, the words
962 “handicapped person” and inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following words:-
963 person with a disability.
964 SECTION 285. Said section 4 of said chapter 151B is hereby further amended by striking
965 out, in lines 296, 302 and 314, as so appearing, the words “hearing impaired” and inserting in
966 place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- deaf or hard of hearing.
48 of 61

967 SECTION 286. Said section 4 of said chapter 151B is hereby further amended by striking
968 out, in lines 306 and 307, 362 and 363, 364, 370, 372, 380 and 381 and 382 and 383, as so
969 appearing, the words “hearing impairment” and inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the
970 following words:- deafness or hardness of hearing.
971 SECTION 287. Said section 4 of said chapter 151B is hereby further amended by striking
972 out, in lines 338 and 340, as so appearing, the words “handicapped persons” and inserting in
973 place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- persons with disabilities.
974 SECTION 288. Said section 4 of said chapter 151B is hereby further amended by striking
975 out, in line 469, as so appearing, the word “handicap-accessible” and inserting in place thereof
976 the following word:- accessible.
977 SECTION 289. Said section 4 of said chapter 151B is hereby further amended by striking
978 out, in line 490, as so appearing, the words “ancestry handicap” and inserting in place thereof the
979 following words:- ancestry, disability.
980 SECTION 290. Said section 4 of said chapter 151B is hereby further amended by striking
981 out, in line 604, as so appearing, the words “is disabled” and inserting in place thereof the
982 following words:- has a disability.
983 SECTION 291. Said section 4 of said chapter 151B is hereby further amended by striking
984 out, in line 717, as so appearing, the words “handicapped individual” and inserting in place
985 thereof the following words:- person with a disability.
49 of 61

986 SECTION 292. Section 1 of chapter 152 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
987 amended by striking out, in line 191, the words “a disabled employee” and inserting in place
988 thereof the following words:- an injured and otherwise eligible employee.
989 SECTION 293. Section 20B of said chapter 152, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
990 striking out, in lines 2 and 3, the words “an incapacitated, disabled or deceased physician” and
991 inserting in place thereof the following words:- a physician who is incapacitated, has a disability
992 or is deceased.
993 SECTION 294. Section 28 of said chapter 152, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
994 striking out, in lines 13 and 14, the words “mentally retarded persons eighteen years of age or
995 older” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- persons age 18 or older who have an
996 intellectual disability as defined in the current version of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of
997 Mental Disorders.
998 SECTION 295. Section 37A of said chapter 152, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
999 striking out, in line 1, the word “disabled” and inserting in place thereof the following words:-
1000 has a disability.
1001 SECTION 296. Section 75B of said chapter 152, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
1002 striking out, in line 5, the words “handicapped person” and inserting in place thereof the
1003 following words:- person with a disability.
1004 SECTION 297. Section 19A of chapter 159 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
1005 hereby amended by striking out, in lines 16 and 17, the words “handicapped or elderly” and
1006 inserting in place thereof the following words:- persons with disabilities or elderly.
50 of 61

1007 SECTION 298. Section 5 of chapter 161A of the General Laws is hereby amended by
1008 striking out, in line 11, as so appearing, the word “handicap” and inserting in place thereof the
1009 following word:- disability.
1010 SECTION 299. Section 9 of said chapter 161A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
1011 striking out, in line 42, the words “the disabled” and inserting in place thereof the following
1012 words:- persons with disabilities.
1013 SECTION 300. Section 25 of said chapter 161A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
1014 striking out, in lines 22 and 23, the words “handicapping condition” and inserting in place
1015 thereof the following word:- disability.
1016 SECTION 301. Section 5 of chapter 161B of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
1017 hereby amended by striking out, in lines 26, 30 and 45, the words “disabled commuter” and
1018 inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- commuters with disabilities.
1019 SECTION 302. Said section 5 of said chapter 161B, as so appearing, is hereby further
1020 amended by striking out, in lines 37 and 38, the words “the physically disabled” and inserting in
1021 place thereof the following words:- persons with physical disabilities.
1022 SECTION 303. Section 15E of chapter 166 of the General Laws is hereby amended by
1023 striking out, in line 192, as so appearing, the following words “disabled persons” and inserting in
1024 place thereof the following words:- persons with disabilities.
1025 SECTION 304. Section 24 of chapter 175 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
1026 amended by striking out, in lines 10 and 11, the words “becomes totally and permanently
51 of 61

1027 disabled” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- suffers a permanent and total
1028 disability.
1029 SECTION 305. Section 36 of said chapter 175, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
1030 striking out, in line 19, the words “or disabled employees” and inserting in place thereof the
1031 following words:- employees or employees with disabilities.
1032 SECTION 306. Section 47X of said chapter 175, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
1033 striking out, in line 34, the words “hearing impaired” and inserting in place thereof the following
1034 words:- deaf or hard of hearing.
1035 SECTION 307. Section 108 of said chapter 175, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
1036 striking out, in line 111, the words “is disabled” and inserting in place thereof the following
1037 words:- has a disability.
1038 SECTION 308. Said section 108 of said chapter 175, as so appearing, is hereby further
1039 amended by striking out, in lines 588 and 589, the words “become totally and permanently
1040 disabled” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- suffers a permanent and total
1041 disability.
1042 SECTION 309. Section 120A of said chapter 175, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
1043 striking out, in line 3, the words “mental retardation” and inserting in place thereof the following
1044 words:- intellectual or developmental disability.
1045 SECTION 310. Section 162Q of said chapter 175, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
1046 striking out, in lines 7 and 8, the words “becomes mentally or physically disabled” and inserting
1047 in place thereof the following words:- suffers a mental or physical disability.
52 of 61

1048 SECTION 311. Section 222 of said chapter 175, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
1049 striking out, in line 114, the words “becomes physically or mentally disabled” and inserting in
1050 place thereof the following words:- suffers a physical or mental disability.
1051 SECTION 312. Section 8Y of chapter 176A of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
1052 hereby amended by striking out, in line 28, the words “hearing impaired” and inserting in place
1053 thereof the following words:- deaf or hard of hearing.
1054 SECTION 313. Section 4EE of chapter 176B of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
1055 hereby amended by striking out, in line 10, the words “hearing impaired” and inserting in place
1056 thereof the following words:- deaf or hard of hearing.
1057 SECTION 314. Section 4N of chapter 176G of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
1058 hereby amended by striking out, in line 23, the words “hearing impaired” and inserting in place
1059 thereof the following words:- deaf or hard of hearing.
1060 SECTION 315. Section 9 of chapter 176J of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
1061 amended by striking out, in lines 40 and 155, the words “been disabled” and inserting in place
1062 thereof, in each instance, the following words:- had a disability.
1063 SECTION 316. Said section 9 of said chapter 176J, as so appearing, is hereby further
1064 amended by striking out, in line 69, the words “is disabled” and inserting in place thereof the
1065 following words:- has a disability.
1066 SECTION 317. Said section 9 of said chapter 176J, as so appearing, is hereby further
1067 amended by striking out, in line 73, and in lines 159 and 160, the words “is no longer disabled”
1068 and inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- no longer has a disability.
53 of 61

1069 SECTION 318. Section 23D of chapter 184 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
1070 hereby amended by striking out, in line 5, the words “disabled persons” and inserting in place
1071 thereof the following words:- persons with disabilities.
1072 SECTION 319. Section 17A of chapter 186 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
1073 hereby amended by striking out, in line 72, the words “or mentally retarded persons” and
1074 inserting in place thereof the following words:- persons or persons with intellectual or
1075 developmental disabilities.
1076 SECTION 320. Section 1 of chapter 188 of the General Laws is hereby amended by
1077 striking out the definition of “Disabled person”, as so appearing.
1078 SECTION 321. Said section 1 of said chapter 188 is hereby further amended by inserting
1079 after the definition of “Owner”, as so appearing, the following definition:-
1080 “Person with a disability”, a person who has a medically-determinable, permanent
1081 physical or mental disability that would meet the disability requirements for Supplemental
1082 Security Income under 42 U.S.C. 1382c(a)(3)(A) and 42 U.S.C. 1382c(a)(3)(C) as in effect at the
1083 time of recording.
1084 SECTION 322. Section 2 of said chapter 188, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
1085 striking out, in lines 2, 7 and 20, and in lines 39 and 40, the words “elderly or disabled person”
1086 and inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- elderly person or person
1087 with a disability.
1088 SECTION 323. Said section 2 of said chapter 188, as so appearing, is hereby further
1089 amended by striking out, in line 11, and in lines 17 and 18, the words “elderly or disabled
54 of 61

1090 person’s” and inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- elderly person’s
1091 or person with a disability’s.
1092 SECTION 324. Section 5 of said chapter 188, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
1093 striking out, in line 19, and in lines 20 and 21, the words “disabled person” and inserting in place
1094 thereof, in each instance, the following words:- person with a disability.
1095 SECTION 325. Section 3-915 of chapter 190B of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
1096 hereby amended by striking out, in lines 22, 26 and 27, the words “disabled person” and
1097 inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- person with a disability.
1098 SECTION 326. Section 5-101 of said chapter 190B, as so appearing, is hereby amended
1099 by striking out clause (12).
1100 SECTION 327. Said section 5-101 of said chapter 190B, as so appearing, is hereby
1101 further amended by striking out, in line 53, the words “injured, disabled” and inserting in place
1102 thereof the following words:- injured persons, persons with disabilities.
1103 SECTION 328. Said section 5-101 of said chapter 190B, as so appearing, is hereby
1104 further amended by striking out, in line 58, the words “developmentally disabled facility” and
1105 inserting in place thereof the following words:- facility for persons with intellectual or
1106 developmental disabilities.
1107 SECTION 329. Section 5-304 of said chapter 190B, as so appearing, is hereby amended
1108 by striking out, in line 16, the words “be mentally retarded” and inserting in place thereof the
1109 following words:- have an intellectual or a developmental disability.
55 of 61

1110 SECTION 330. Section 5-309 of said chapter 190B, as so appearing, is hereby amended
1111 by striking out, in line 57, the words “or a mental retardation facility” and inserting in place
1112 thereof the following words:- intermediate care facility for individuals with intellectual or
1113 developmental disabilities.
1114 SECTION 331. Section 5-404 of said chapter 190B, as so appearing, is hereby amended
1115 by striking out, in line 57, the words “be developmentally disabled” and inserting in place
1116 thereof the following words:- have an intellectual or a developmental disability.
1117 SECTION 332. Section 5-407 of said chapter 190B, as so appearing, is hereby amended
1118 by striking out, in line 18, the words “disabled person” and inserting in place thereof the
1119 following words:- person with a disability.
1120 SECTION 333. Section 32 of chapter 209 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
1121 amended by striking out, in line 6, the words “mental retardation” and inserting in place thereof
1122 the following words:- an intellectual or a developmental disability.
1123 SECTION 334. Section 25 of chapter 211 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
1124 amended by striking out, in lines 4 and 5, the words “mentally or physically disabled persons”
1125 and inserting in place thereof the following words:- persons with intellectual, developmental or
1126 physical disabilities.
1127 SECTION 335. Said section 25 of said chapter 211, as so appearing, is hereby further
1128 amended by striking out, in lines 25 and 26, the words “disabled community” and inserting in
1129 place thereof the following words:- the disability community.
56 of 61

1130 SECTION 336. Section 34 of chapter 215 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
1131 amended by striking out, in line 57, the words “is not disabled” and inserting in place thereof the
1132 following words:- does not have a disability.
1133 SECTION 337. Section 92A of chapter 221 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
1134 hereby amended by striking out, in lines 2, 8, 11, 13, 15, 23, 27, 32, 42, 45, 54 and 60, the words
1135 “hearing–impaired” and inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- hard
1136 of hearing.
1137 SECTION 338. Said section 92A of said chapter 221, as so appearing, is hereby further
1138 amended by striking out, in lines 6, 56 and 61, the words “hearing-impaired” and inserting in
1139 place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- deaf or hard of hearing.
1140 SECTION 339. Section 9 of chapter 221A of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
1141 hereby amended by striking out, in lines 21 and 22, the words “elderly and handicapped
1142 individuals” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- elderly persons and persons
1143 with disabilities
1144 SECTION 340. Section 16 of chapter 224 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
1145 amended by striking out, in lines 5 and 6, and in lines 42 and 53, the words “handicapped
1146 person” and inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- person with a
1147 disability.
1148 SECTION 341. Section 23E of chapter 233 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
1149 hereby amended by striking out, in lines 36 and 50, the words “mental retardation” and inserting
1150 in place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- an intellectual or a developmental
1151 disability.
57 of 61

1152 SECTION 342. Section 4 of said chapter 234A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
1153 striking out, in line 29, the words “is permanently disabled” and inserting in place thereof the
1154 following words:- has a permanent disability.
1155 SECTION 343. Said section 4 of said chapter 234A, as so appearing, is hereby further
1156 amended by striking out, in lines 36 and 37, the words “permanently disabled person” and
1157 inserting in place thereof the following words:- person with a permanent disability.
1158 SECTION 344. Said section 4 of said chapter 234A, as so appearing, is hereby further
1159 amended by striking out, in lines 39, 41 and 44, the words “disabled person” and inserting in
1160 place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- person with a disability.
1161 SECTION 345. Section 56 of said chapter 234A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
1162 striking out, in lines 8 and 9, the words “handicapped and elderly jurors or handicapped and
1163 elderly dependents of jurors” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- elderly jurors
1164 and jurors with disabilities, elderly dependents of jurors or a juror’s dependents with disabilities.
1165 SECTION 346. Section 34 of chapter 235 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
1166 amended by striking out, in line 56, the words “handicapped person” and inserting in place
1167 thereof the following words:- person with a disability.
1168 SECTION 347. Section 9 of chapter 239 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
1169 amended by striking out, in lines 13 and 25, the words “handicapped person” and inserting in
1170 place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- person with a disability.
58 of 61

1171 SECTION 348. Said section 9 of said chapter 239, as so appearing, is hereby further
1172 amended by striking out, in line 32, the words “handicapped persons” and inserting in place
1173 thereof the following words:- persons with disabilities.
1174 SECTION 349. Section 5B of chapter 260 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
1175 hereby amended by striking out, in line 5, the word “handicap” and inserting in place thereof the
1176 following word:- disability.
1177 SECTION 350. Section 40 of chapter 262 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
1178 amended by striking out, in line 110, the words “disabled abuse” and inserting in place thereof
1179 the following words:- abuse of persons with disabilities.
1180 SECTION 351. Section 13F of chapter 265 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
1181 hereby amended by inserting after the word “intellectual, in lines 2, 3, 12, 13 14 and 15, each
1182 time it appears, the following words:- or developmental.
1183 SECTION 352. Section 13F of said chapter 265, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
1184 striking out, in lines 21 and 22, the words “mentally retarded person” and inserting in place
1185 thereof, in each instance, the following words:- person with an intellectual or developmental
1186 disability.
1187 SECTION 353. Section 39 of said chapter 265, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
1188 striking out, in line 11, as so appearing, the word “handicap” and inserting in place thereof the
1189 following word:- disability.
59 of 61

1190 SECTION 354. Section 45 of said chapter 265, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
1191 striking out, in line 3, the words “mentally retarded person” and inserting in place thereof the
1192 following words:- person with an intellectual or a developmental disability.
1193 SECTION 355. Section 123 of chapter 266 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
1194 hereby amended by striking out, in lines 6 and 7, the words “and developmentally disabled
1195 persons” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- persons and persons with
1196 intellectual or developmental disabilities.
1197 SECTION 356. Section 48 of chapter 271 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
1198 amended by striking out, in lines 4 and 5, the words “disabled veterans” and inserting in place
1199 thereof the following words:- veterans with disabilities.
1200 SECTION 357. Section 98A of chapter 272 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
1201 hereby amended by striking out, in lines 2 and 3, and in lines 14 and 15, the words “,deaf or
1202 hearing handicapped person, or other physically handicapped person” and inserting in place
1203 thereof, in each instance, the following words:- person who is deaf or person with a hearing
1204 disability or other disability.
1205 SECTION 358. Said Section 98A of said chapter 272, as so appearing, is hereby further
1206 amended by striking out, in lines 9 and 10, the words “or deaf or hearing handicapped or other
1207 physically handicapped person” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- person who
1208 is deaf or person with a hearing disability or other disability.
1209 SECTION 359. Section 23 of chapter 273 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
1210 amended by striking out, in line 1, the words “needy disabled person” and inserting in place
1211 thereof the following words:- person with a disability.
60 of 61

1212 SECTION 360. Section 100E of chapter 276 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
1213 hereby amended by striking out the definition of “Disabled person”.
1214 SECTION 361. Said section 100E of said chapter 276, as so appearing, is hereby further
1215 amended by inserting after the definition of “Person” the following definition:-
1216 “Person with a disability”, a person with an intellectual or a developmental disability as
1217 defined in section 1 of chapter 123B or who otherwise has a mental or physical disability and, as
1218 a result of such mental or physical disability, is wholly or partially dependent on others to meet
1219 daily living needs.
1220 SECTION 362. Section 100J of said chapter 276, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
1221 striking out, in line 9, the words “disabled person” and inserted in place thereof the following
1222 words:- person with a disability
61 of 61